Florida, session 2026, SB958.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that: 18 (a)âMany businesses and communities in this state are using 19 paper drinking straws and stirrers as a purportedly better 20 option for public health and the environment. However, 21 independent university studies have shown that most paper straws 22 contain harmful PFAS chemicals, exposure to which is linked to 23 concerning health risks. 24 (b)âPaper drinking straw regulations marginalize residents 25 with disabilities for whom paper straws are not an option. 26 (c)âAny regulation of drinking straws and stirrers must be 27 based on government policy driven by science. 28 (2)âThe Legislature intends to: 29 (a)âCombat the harmful impacts of paper drinking straws and 30 stirrers and provide businesses and residents of this state with 31 better alternatives to single-use plastic straws and stirrers; 32 and 33 (b)âPromote uniformity of drinking straw and stirrer 34 regulations throughout this state, rather than forcing 35 businesses to comply with a patchwork of local regulations. 36 Section 2.âSection 403.7034, Florida Statutes, is created 37 to read: 38 403.7034âLocal regulation of drinking straws and stirrers.â 39 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 40 (a)ââCertification bodyâ means a recognized, independent, 41 third-party verification body, such as the Biodegradable 42 Products Institute or TUV Austria, which certifies products that 43 meet ASTM standards for compostability. 44 (b)ââHome compostable certifiedâ means a product certified 45 by a certification body as home compostable. 46 (c)ââIndustrial compostable certifiedâ means a product 47 certified by a certification body as industrially compostable. 48 (d)ââMarine biodegradableâ means a product will completely 49 break down, biodegrade, and return to nature by decomposing into 50 elements found in the marine environment in less than 1 year, as 51 shown by competent and reliable scientific evidence. 52 (e)ââRenewableâ means a product certified under: 53 1.âThe USDA BioPreferred Program with biobased content of 54 at least 80 percent; or 55 2.âThe TUV Austria OK biobased program with a 4-star 56 rating. 57 (2)âA local governmental entity may not enact any rule, 58 regulation, or ordinance regarding the use, disposition, sale, 59 prohibition, or restriction of drinking straws or stirrers which 60 does not meet the requirements of this section. By January 1, 61 2027, a local governmental entity shall amend any such rule, 62 regulation, or ordinance in effect as of the effective date of 63 this act which does not permit the sale or use of drinking 64 straws and stirrers that are renewable, home compostable 65 certified, industrial compostable certified, or marine 66 biodegradable to permit the sale or use of renewable, home 67 compostable certified, industrial compostable certified and 68 marine biodegradable drinking straws and stirrers. 69 (3)âIf a local governmental entity elects to enact any 70 rule, regulation, or ordinance regarding the use, disposition, 71 sale, prohibition, or restriction of drinking straws or 72 stirrers, such rule, regulation, or ordinance must require that 73 drinking straws or stirrers be: 74 (a)âRenewable; 75 (b)âHome compostable certified; 76 (c)âIndustrial compostable certified; and 77 (d)âMarine biodegradable. 78 (4)âThis section does not apply to a drinking straw or 79 stirrer sold, distributed, or used in any of the following: 80 (a)âA prepackaged drink sold at a commercial establishment. 81 (b)âA hospital, a medical care facility, or a senior care 82 facility. 83 (5)âThis section may not be construed to require a local 84 governmental entity to adopt any rule, regulation, or ordinance 85 relating to the use, disposition, sale, prohibition, or 86 restriction of drinking straws or stirrers. 87 Section 3.âThe Division of Law Revision is directed to 88 replace the phrase âthe effective date of this actâ wherever it 89 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law. 90 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.